District of Columbia statutes.
16-922

Validity of marriages and divorces solemnized or pronounced before January 1, 1902.

This chapter does not invalidate any marriage solemnized according to law before January 1, 1902, or any decree or judgment of divorce pronounced before that date.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 563, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-922.
1973 Ed., § 16-922.